Mississippi, session 2026, HB843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-25.  (1)  (a)  Any person having a permanent or temporary residence in this state or who is employed or attending school in this state who has been convicted of a registrable offense in this state or another jurisdiction or who has been acquitted by reason of insanity of a registrable offense in this state or another jurisdiction shall register with the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides, the responsible agency and the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.  Registration shall not be required for an offense that is not a registrable sex offense or for an offender who is under fourteen (14) years of age.  The department shall provide the initial registration information as well as every change of name, change of address, change of status at a school, or other change of information as required by the department to the sheriff of the county of the residence address of the registrant, the sheriff of the county of the employment address, and the sheriff of the county of the school address, if applicable, and any other jurisdiction of the registrant through either written notice, electronic or telephone transmissions, or online access to registration information.  Further, the department shall provide this information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.  Additionally, upon notification by the registrant that he intends to reside outside the State of Mississippi, the department shall notify the appropriate state law enforcement agency of any state to which a registrant is moving or has moved. (b)  Any person having a permanent or temporary residence or who is employed or attending school in this state who has been adjudicated delinquent for a registrable sex offense listed in this paragraph that involved use of force against the victim shall register as a sex offender with the responsible agency and shall personally appear at a facility designated by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of registering with the responsible agency: (i)  Section 97-3-71 relating to rape and assault with intent to ravish; (ii)  Section 97-3-95 relating to sexual battery; (iii)  Section 97-3-65 relating to statutory rape; or (iv)  Conspiracy to commit, accessory to the commission of, or attempt to commit any offense listed in this paragraph. (2)  Any person required to register under this chapter shall submit the following information at the time of registration: (a)  Name, including a former name which has been legally changed; (b)  Street address of all current permanent and temporary residences within state or out of state at which the sex offender resides or habitually lives, including dates of temporary lodgings.  There is a presumption that a registrant owes a duty of updating registration information if the registrant remains away from a registered address for seven (7) or more aggregate days in a six (6) month period; (c)  Date, place and address of employment, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern or as a transient or day laborer; (d)  Crime for which charged, arrested or convicted; (e)  Date and place of conviction, adjudication or acquittal by reason of insanity; (f)  Aliases used or nicknames, ethnic or tribal names by which commonly known; (g)  Social security number and any purported social security number or numbers; (h)  Date and place of birth and any purported date and place of birth; (i)  Age, race, sex, height, weight, hair and eye colors, and any other physical description or identifying factors; (j)  A brief description of the offense or offenses for which the registration is required; (k)  Driver's license or state or other jurisdiction identification card number, which license or card may be electronically accessed by the Department of Public Safety; (l)  Anticipated future residence; (m)  If the registrant's residence is a motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home or manufactured home, the registrant shall also provide vehicle identification number, license tag number, registration number and a description, including color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home or manufactured home; if the registrant's place of residence is a vessel or houseboat, the registrant shall also provide the hull identification number, manufacturer's serial number, name of the vessel or houseboat, registration number and a description, including color scheme, of the vessel or houseboat, including permanent or frequent locations where the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, manufactured home, vessel or houseboat is kept; (n)  Vehicle make, model, color and license tag number for all vehicles owned or operated by the sex offender, whether for work or personal use, and the permanent or frequent locations where a vehicle is kept; (o)  Offense history; (p)  Photograph; (q)  Fingerprints and palm prints; (r)  Documentation of any treatment received for any mental abnormality or personality disorder of the person; (s)  Biological sample; (t)  Name of any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of higher education at which the offender is employed, carries on a vocation (with or without compensation) or is enrolled as a student, or will be enrolled as a student, and the registrant's status; (u)  Copy of conviction or sentencing order for the sex offense for which registration is required; (v)  The offender's parole, probation or supervised release status and the existence of any outstanding arrest warrants; (w)  Every online identity, screen name or username used, registered or created by a registrant; (x)  Professional licensing information which authorizes the registrant to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or occupation; (y)  Information from passport and immigration documents; (z)  All telephone numbers, including, but not limited to, permanent residence, temporary residence, cell phone and employment phone numbers, whether landlines or cell phones; and (aa)  Any other information deemed necessary. (3)  For purposes of this chapter, a person is considered to be residing in this state if he maintains a permanent or temporary residence as defined in Section 45-33-23, including students, temporary employees and military personnel on assignment. (4)  (a)  A person required to register under this chapter shall not reside within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school, a child care facility, a residential child-caring agency, a children's group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. (b)  A person residing within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or a child care facility does not commit a violation of this subsection if any of the following apply: (i)  The person is serving a sentence at a jail, prison, juvenile facility or other correctional institution or facility. (ii)  The person is subject to an order of commitment under Title 41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (iii)  The person established the subject residence before July 1, 2006. (iv)  The school or child care facility is established within three thousand (3,000) feet of the person's residence subsequent to the date the person established residency. (v)  The person established the subject residence between July 1, 2006, and January 1, 2014, in a location at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet from the school or child care facility. (vi)  The person is a minor or a ward under a guardianship. (c)  A person residing within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a residential child-caring agency, a children's group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years does not commit a violation of this subsection if any of the following apply: (i)  The person established the subject residence before July 1, 2008. (ii)  The residential child-caring agency, children's group care home, playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years is established within three thousand (3,000) feet of the person's residence subsequent to the date the person established residency. (iii)  The person established the subject residence between July 1, 2008, and January 1, 2014, in a location at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet from the residential child-caring agency, children's group care home, playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. (iv)  Any of the conditions described in subsection (4)(b)(i), (ii) or (vi) exist. (5)  The Department of Public Safety is required to obtain the text of the law defining the offense or offenses for which the registration is required. SECTION 2.  Section 45-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-27.  (1)  A person required to register on the basis of a conviction, adjudication of delinquency or acquittal by reason of insanity entered shall register with the responsible agency within three (3) business days of the date of judgment unless the person is immediately confined or committed, in which case the person shall register before release in accordance with the procedures established by the department.  The responsible agency shall immediately forward the registration information to the Department of Public Safety.  The person is also required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) days of registration with the responsible agency and to obtain a sex offender registration card.  In addition to the requirements of this section, if the responsible agency is not the sheriff of the county in which the person resides, the person shall also register with the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides within three (3) business days after first residing in or returning to the county. (2)  If a person who is required to register under this section is released from prison or placed on parole or supervised release or in a restitution center or community work center, the Department of Corrections shall perform the registration duties before placement in a center or before release and immediately forward the registration information to the Department of Public Safety.  The person is also required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) days of release or placement in a restitution center or community work center. (3)  If a person required to register under this section is placed on probation, the court, at the time of entering the order, shall register the person and immediately forward the registration information to the Department of Public Safety.  The person is also required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) days of the entry of the order.  In addition to the requirements of this section, the person shall also register with the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides within three (3) business days after first residing in or returning to a county of this state. (4)  Any person required to register who is neither incarcerated, detained nor committed at the time the requirement to register attaches shall present himself to the * * *county sheriff of the county in which he or she resides to register within three (3) business days, and shall personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) days of the time the requirement to register attaches. (5)  An offender moving to or returning to this state from another jurisdiction shall notify the Department of Public Safety ten (10) days before the person first resides in or returns to this state and shall present himself to the sheriff of the county of his residence within three (3) business days after first residing in or returning to a county of this state to provide the required registration information.  The person is also required to register by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) days after first residing in or moving to a county of this state.  If the offender fails to appear for registration as required in this state, the department shall notify the other jurisdiction of the failure to register. (6)  A person, other than a person confined in a correctional or juvenile detention facility or involuntarily committed on the basis of mental illness, who is required to register on the basis of a sex offense for which a conviction, adjudication of delinquency or acquittal by reason of insanity was entered shall register with the sheriff of the county in which he resides no later than * * *August 15, 2000, or within three (3) business days of first residing in or returning to a county of this state. (7)  Every person required to register shall show proof of domicile.  The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to enforce this requirement and shall prescribe the means by which such person may show domicile. (8)  Any driver's license photograph, I.D. photograph, sex offender photograph, fingerprint, driver's license application and/or anything submitted to the Department of Public Safety by a known convicted sex offender, registered or not registered, can be used by the Department of Public Safety or any other authorized law enforcement agency for any means necessary in registration, identification, investigation regarding their tracking or identification. (9)  The department * * *will shall assist local law enforcement agencies in the effort to conduct address and other verifications of registered sex offenders and will assist in the location and apprehension of noncompliant sex offenders. SECTION 3.  Section 45-33-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-29.  (1)  Upon any change of address, including temporary lodging, an offender required to register under this chapter is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, not less than ten (10) days before he intends to first reside at the new address. (2)  Upon any change in the status of a registrant's enrollment, employment or vocation at any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of higher education, the offender is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of the change. (3)  Upon any change of employment or change of name, a registrant is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of the change. (4)  Upon any change of vehicle information, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (5)  Upon any change of e-mail address or addresses, instant message address or addresses, or any other designation used in Internet communications, postings or telephone communications, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (6)  Upon any change of information deemed by the department to be necessary to the state's policy to assist local law enforcement agencies' efforts to protect their communities, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (7)  Upon change of any information described in subsections (1) through (6) of this section, the person shall also provide the same applicable information from subsections (1) through (6) of this section to the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides within three (3) business days of the change. SECTION 4.  Section 45-33-32, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-32.  (1)  A person convicted of a sex offense who volunteers for an organization in which volunteers have direct, private and unsupervised contact with minors under the age of eighteen (18) shall notify the organization of the person's conviction * * *at no less than three (3) business days before the time of volunteering.  Such notification must be in writing to the organization.  Any organization which accepts volunteers must notify volunteers of this disclosure requirement upon application of the volunteer to serve or prior to acceptance of any of the volunteer's service, whichever occurs first. (2)  If the organization, after notification by the offender as provided in subsection (1), accepts the offender as a volunteer, the organization shall make reasonable attempts to notify the parents or guardians of any minors under the age of eighteen (18) involved in the organization of the offender's criminal record. (3)  This section applies to all registered sex offenders regardless of the date of conviction. (4)  Any person previously registered as a sex offender and who has a continuing obligation to be registered as a sex offender shall be notified of the person's duty under this section with the first reregistration form to be sent to the person after July 1, 2004. (5)  If the registered sex offender is currently volunteering for such an organization, the sex offender must resign or notify the organization immediately upon receipt of notice or be subject to the penalties of this chapter. (6)  An organization acting in good faith in making the notification to parents or guardians under this section, or who fails in good faith to make such notification, shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action as a result of the notification or failure to notify. SECTION 5.  Section 45-33-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-35.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall maintain a central registry of sex offender information as defined in Section 45-33-25 and shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.  The responsible agencies shall provide the information required in Section 45-33-25 on a form developed by the department to ensure accurate information is maintained. (2)  Upon conviction, adjudication or acquittal by reason of insanity of any sex offender, if the sex offender is not immediately confined or not sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the clerk of the court which convicted and sentenced the sex offender shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the department. (3)  Before release from prison or placement on parole, supervised release or in a work center or restitution center, the Department of Corrections shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety. (4)  Before release from a community regional mental health center or from confinement in a mental institution following an acquittal by reason of insanity, the director of the facility shall inform the offender of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety. (5)  Before release from a youthful offender facility, the director of the facility shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety. (6)  In addition to performing the registration duties, the responsible agency shall: (a)  Inform the person having a duty to register that: (i)  The person is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, at least ten (10) days before changing address. (ii)  Any change of address to another jurisdiction shall be reported to the department by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, not less than ten (10) days before the change of address. The offender shall comply with any registration requirement in the new jurisdiction. (iii)  The person must register in any jurisdiction where the person is employed, carries on a vocation, is stationed in the military or is a student. (iv)  Address verifications shall be made by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within the required time period. (v)  Notification or verification of a change in status of a registrant's enrollment, employment or vocation at any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education shall be reported to the department by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of the change. (vi)  If the person has been convicted of a sex offense, the person shall notify any organization for which the person volunteers in which volunteers have direct, private or unsupervised contact with minors that the person has been convicted of a sex offense as provided in Section 45-33-32(1). (vii)  Upon any change of name or employment, a registrant is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of the change. (viii)  Upon any change of vehicle information, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (ix)  Upon any change of e-mail address or addresses, instant message address or addresses or any other designation used in Internet communications, postings or telephone communications, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (x)  Upon any change of information deemed to be necessary to the state's policy to assist local law enforcement agencies' efforts to protect their communities, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (xi)  Any change of information required to be reported to the Department of Public Safety shall also be required to be reported to the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides within three (3) business days of the change. (b)  Require the person to read and sign a form stating that the duty of the person to register under this chapter has been explained. (c)  Obtain or facilitate the obtaining of a biological sample from every registrant as required by this chapter if such biological sample has not already been provided to the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory. (d)  Provide a copy of the order of conviction or sentencing order to the department at the time of registration. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.